Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6126.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 15. The tax imposed under section 14(1) must be allocated as follows: (a) Thirty percent to the city in which the sports betting operatorâs casino is located, for use in connection with the following: (i) The hiring, training, and deployment of street patrol officers in that city. (ii) Neighborhood development programs designed to create jobs in that city with a focus on blighted neighborhoods. (iii) Public safety programs such as emergency medical services, fire department programs, and street lighting in that city. (iv) Anti-gang and youth development programs in that city. (v) Other programs that are designed to contribute to the improvement of the quality of life in that city. (vi) Relief to the taxpayers of that city from 1 or more taxes or fees imposed by that city. (vii) The costs of capital improvements in that city. (viii) Road construction, repairs, and improvements in that city. (b) Sixty-five percent to this state to be deposited into the fund. (c) Five percent to the Michigan agriculture equine industry development fund created under section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320. However, if the 5% allocated under this subdivision to the Michigan agriculture equine industry development fund created under section 20 of the horse racing law of 1995, 1995 PA 279, MCL 431.320, exceeds $3,000,000.00 in a fiscal year, the amount in excess of $3,000,000.00 must be allocated and deposited in the fund created under section 16. Sec. 16. (1) The internet sports betting fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets required to be paid into the fund under this act or from any other source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the fund. The state treasurer shall credit to the fund interest and earnings from fund investments. (3) The board is the administrator of the fund for auditing purposes. (4) The board shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, for all of the following: (a) The boardâs costs of regulating and enforcing internet sports betting under this act. (b) After the expenditure under subdivision (a), each year, $1,000,000.00 to the compulsive gaming prevention fund created in section 3 of the compulsive gaming prevention act, 1997 PA 70, MCL 432.253. (c) After the expenditures under subdivisions (a) and (b), each fiscal year, an amount, not to exceed $7,000,000.00, to the Christopher R. Slezak first responder presumed coverage fund created in section 405 of the workerâs disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.405, to pay 50% of the costs incurred in the payment of approved claims and the administration of the Christopher R. Slezak first responder presumed coverage fund under section 405 of the workerâs disability compensation act of 1969, 1969 PA 317, MCL 418.405. (d) After the expenditures under subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), each year, $1,000,000.00 to the Michigan strategic fund created in section 5 of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2005, for distribution to federally recognized tribal governments in Michigan for essential government services. The funds must be distributed according to an allocation plan recommended by the Inter-Tribal Council of Michigan. (e) All money remaining in the fund after the expenditures under subdivisions (a) to (d) must be deposited into the state school aid fund established under section 11 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963. (5) As used in this section, âfederally recognized tribal governmentâ means any Indian tribe, band, nation, or other organized group or community of Indians that is recognized as eligible by the United States Secretary of the Interior for the special programs and services provided by the United States to Indians because of their status as Indians, and is recognized as possessing powers of self-government. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor